Maryland, session 2025, HB1314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 25. FEES FOR PRIOR AUTHORIZATIONS – PROHIBITED.
24–2501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CARRIER” MEANS:
(1) A HEALTH INSURER;
(2) A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN;
(3) A HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION; OR
(4) ANY OTHER ENTITY THAT PROVIDES HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS
SUBJECT TO REGULATION BY THE STATE.
(C) “HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” MEANS:
(1) A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER REGULATED UNDER THE HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE; OR
(2) A FACILITY THAT PROVIDES HEALTH CARE TO INDIVIDUALS.
(D) “PRIOR AUTHORIZATION” MEANS A UTILIZATION MANAGEMENT
TECHNIQUE THAT:
(1) IS USED BY CARRIERS AND MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS;
(2) REQUIRES PRIOR APPROVAL FOR A PROCEDURE, TREATMENT,
MEDICATION, OR SERVICE BEFORE AN ENROLLEE IS ELIGIBLE FOR FULL PAYMENT
OF THE BENEFIT; AND
(3) IS USED TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE PROCEDURE, TREATMENT,
MEDICATION, OR SERVICE IS MEDICALLY NECESSARY.
24–2502.

HOUSE BILL 1314 3
A AN IN–NETWORK HEALTH CARE PROVIDER MAY NOT CHARGE A FEE TO
OBTAIN A PRIOR AUTHORIZATION FROM A CARRIER OR MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION.
Article – Insurance
15–1012.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3.5–801 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “PRIOR AUTHORIZATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–230
OF THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES THAT ARE
ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT USE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE TO AUTOMATICALLY DENY A PRIOR AUTHORIZATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.